Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1867.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6129. Prohibition of extreme risk protective orders.(a) Prohibition.--A court in this Commonwealth may not issue an extreme risk protective order.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "extreme risk protective order" means a court order that attempts to deprive an individual of their constitutional right to own, possess or receive a firearm, or require the person to surrender their firearm, who is not prevented from owning, possessing or receiving such firearm under section 6105 (relating to persons 1234567891011121314151617 not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms).Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1867PN2317 - 2 - 123